Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to  the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Chief Operating Office .............. $ 338,752
(2) Court appointed special
advocates .................................. $ 2,771,167
(3) Oregon Public Broadcasting ..... $ 500,000
(4) Oregon Historical Society ......... $ 750,000
(5) State Fair Council ..................... $ 1,015,299
(6) Debt service .............................. $ 7,042,720
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described
in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the following purposes:
(1) Chief Operating Office .............. $ 7,903,033
(2) Chief Financial Office ............... $ 15,054,105
(3) Office of the State Chief
Information Officer
- Policy ...................................... $ 80,628,905
(4) Chief Human Resources
Office......................................... $ 29,323,280
(5) Office of the State Chief
Information Officer
- State Data Center:
(a) Operations................................. $121,114,336
(b) Pass-through expenditures ....... $ 11,514,430
(c) Equipment lifecycle
Enrolled Senate Bill 5502 (SB 5502-A) Page 1
replacement .............................. $ 17,317,062
(6) Enterprise Asset
Management.............................. $102,121,159
(7) Enterprise Goods
and Services.............................. $109,473,220
(8) Business Services...................... $ 16,264,774
(9) Capital improvements ............... $ 4,570,497
(10) Principal and interest
payments for outstanding
Article XI-O bonds .................... $423,918,680
(11) Treasury fees ............................ $ 747,641
(12) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
debt service............................... $ 15,826,180
(13) Court appointed special
advocates .................................. $ 2,492,500
(14) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
information technology ............. $ 14,670,350
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$21,582,690 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services from lottery
moneys allocated from the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund for debt
service and related costs for bonds issued in previous biennia.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,828,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses to support the county fairs in this state from lottery moneys allocated
from the  Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services that are  deposited in the County Fair Account established under
ORS 565.445.
SECTION 5.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the following  expenditures by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from  the Insurance Fund for acquiring and purchasing insurance or
reinsurance, allocating and collecting premiums  and paying claims for coverage pursuant to
statutory authority.
(2) Expenditures from  the Mass Transit Assistance Account for payments described in
ORS 291.407 to mass transit districts, transportation districts and service districts.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5502 (SB 5502-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5502 (SB 5502-A) Page 3